District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.12

Personal information; limit on use.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under this subchapter may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 712, 63 DCR 222